Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.800

Construction—Student practice.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict practice by a regularly enrolled student in a cardiovascular invasive specialist program approved by the secretary whose practice is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments. Persons practicing under this section must be clearly identified as students.

[ 2010 c 92 s 4.]

NOTES:

Interpretation—2010 c 92: See note following RCW 18.84.080.